tests/dotcond.aff
SET UTF-8
TRY abz
WORDCHARS .
NEEDAFFIX !

# Append "a" if the word is at least 3 character long
# Append "b" if the word is at least 3 character long and the second last character is "."
SFX X Y 2
SFX X 0 a ...
SFX X 0 b .[.].
